Hawaii statutes.
[§420D‑9] Benefit officer. (a)
A sustainable business corporation may have an officer designated as the
benefit officer who shall have the authority and shall perform the duties in
the management of the sustainable business corporation relating to the purpose
of the corporation to create general or specific public benefit as may be
provided by or pursuant to the bylaws or, in the absence of controlling
provisions in the bylaws, as may be determined by or pursuant to resolutions or
orders of the board of directors. If a sustainable business corporation has a
benefit officer, the duties of the benefit officer shall include preparing the
benefit report required by section 420D-11.

(b) A benefit officer shall be independent of
and shall have no material relationship with the sustainable business
corporation. [L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next